Colorado, session 2026A, HB1159.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of labor and
employment for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws
of Colorado 2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part X as
follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART X
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT
(1) EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S OFFICE
(A) Executive Director's Office
Personal Services 12,332,853
(114.2 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 25,034,082
25,502,762
Short-term Disability 100,435
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 645,654
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 14,347,869
Salary Survey 4,243,119
Step Pay 1,388,159
PERA Direct Distribution 2,553,224
Workers' Compensation 528,903
Operating Expenses 2,004,121
Legal Services 1,249,404
Payment to Risk
Management and Property
Funds 392,166
Vehicle Lease Payments 295,709
223,596
Leased Space 10,738,853
Capitol Complex Leased
Space 66,105
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1159

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Payments to OIT 37,896,600
37,255,624
CORE Operations 78,016
Utilities 260,309
Information Technology
Asset Maintenance 218,626
Statewide Indirect Cost
Assessment 611,569
114,985,776 12,321,688 56,361,593a 613,453b 45,689,042(I)
114,741,367 11,984,559 56,454,859a 610,701b 45,691,248(I)
a Of this amount, an estimated $21,433,029 $21,623,023 shall be from the Employment Support Fund created in Section 8-77-109 (1)(b), C.R.S., $12,334,999(I) $12,446,045(I) shall
be from the Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund created in Section 8-13.3-518 (1), C.R.S., which is continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 8-13.3-518 (1), C.R.S., and
is included for informational purposes only, $4,298,055 $4,333,707 shall be from the Workers' Compensation Cash Fund created in Section 8-44-112 (7)(a), C.R.S., $3,617,360
$3,620,763 shall be from the Petroleum Storage Tank Fund created in Section 8-20.5-103 (1), C.R.S., $2,697,237 $2,715,717 shall be from the Unemployment Revenue Fund created
in Section 8-77-106 (1), C.R.S., $710,982 $719,601 shall be from the Boiler Inspection Fund created in Section 9-4-109 (4), C.R.S., $425,687 $430,170 shall be from the Major Medical
Insurance Fund created in Section 8-46-202 (1)(a), C.R.S., $334,279 $338,361 shall be from the Subsequent Injury Fund created in Section 8-46-101 (1)(b)(I), C.R.S., $144,422 shall
be from the Disability Support Fund created in Section 8-88-205 (1), C.R.S., $79,428 shall be from the Wage Theft Enforcement Fund created in Section 8-4-113 (3)(a), C.R.S., $42,952
shall be from the Workforce Development Fund created in Section 8-83-107 (4), C.R.S., and $10,243,163 $9,960,670 shall be from various sources of cash funds. Of the amount from
the Major Medical Insurance Fund, $9,452(I) is for Legal Services and is included for informational purposes only because money in the Major Medical Insurance Fund is continuously
appropriated for payment of legal fees pursuant to Section 8-46-202 (1)(c), C.R.S. Of the amount from the Subsequent Injury Fund, $6,920(I) is for Legal Services and is included for
informational purposes only because money in the Subsequent Injury Fund is continuously appropriated for payment of legal fees pursuant to Section 8-46-101 (4)(b), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $611,569 $608,817 shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S., and $1,884
shall be from the Mobile Sources Local Grants line item and the Stationary Sources Local Contracts line item in the Department of Public Health and Environment.
(B) Office of New Americans
Program Costs 524,806 509,806 15,000a
(5.5 FTE)
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1159

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Colorado Refugee Services
Program 8,262,503 8,262,503(I)
(7.5 FTE)
Appropriation to
Immigration Legal Defense
Fund 350,000 350,000
Statewide Welcome,
Reception, and Integration
Grant Program 82,710 82,710b
(1.0 FTE)
9,220,019
a This amount shall be from the Immigration Legal Defense Fund created in Section 8-3.8-101 (2), C.R.S., which is continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 8-3.8-101 (2), C.R.S.,
and shown for informational purposes only.
b This amount shall be from the Statewide Welcome, Reception, and Integration Cash Fund created in Section 8-3.7-205 (1), C.R.S.
(C) Office of Future of Work
Program Costs 1,486,277 525,580 960,697a
(6.8 FTE)
State Apprenticeship Agency 1,005,593 1,005,593
(8.8 FTE)
2,491,870
a Of this amount, an estimated $423,321 shall be from the Scale-Up Grant Fund created in Section 8-15.7-305 (1), C.R.S., $428,312 shall be from the Qualified Apprenticeship
Intermediary Grant Fund created in Section 8-15.7-405 (1), C.R.S., and $109,064 shall be from the Employment Support Fund created in Section 8-77-109 (1)(b), C.R.S.
(D) Office of Just Transition
Program Costs 432,635 432,635
(3.5 FTE)
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1159

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Coal Transition Community
Assistance64 10,000,000 10,000,000a
Coal Transition Worker
Assistance64 5,000,000 5,000,000b
15,432,635
a This amount shall be from the Just Transition Cash Fund created in Section 8-83-504 (1), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Coal Transition Workforce Assistance Program Account of the Just Transition Cash Fund created in Section 8-83-504.5 (1)(a)(I), C.R.S.
(E) Colorado Disability Opportunity Office
Colorado Disability
Opportunity Office OFFICE64a 5,598,905 5,598,905a
(6.0 FTE)
5,598,905
a Of this amount, it is estimated that $5,498,905 shall be from the Disability Support Fund created in Section 8-88-205 (1), C.R.S., and $100,000 shall be from the Disabled Parking
Education and Enforcement Fund created in Section 42-1-226, C.R.S.
147,729,205
147,484,796
(2) DIVISION OF UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE
Program Costs 80,577,246 100,000 15,192,997a 65,284,249(I)
(484.7 FTE)
a Of this amount, it is estimated that $11,160,554 shall be from the Employment and Training Technology Fund created in Section 8-77-109 (2)(a.9)(II)(A), C.R.S., $3,371,879 shall
be from the Unemployment Revenue Fund created in Section 8-77-106 (1), C.R.S., and $660,564 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1159

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(3) DIVISION OF EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING
(A) Division of Employment and Training
State Operations and
Program Costs 4,730,281 150,000 504,273a 4,076,008(I)
(50.6 FTE)
Trade Adjustment Act
Assistance 2,000,000 2,000,000(I)
Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act 38,841,230 38,841,230(I)
(87.2 FTE)
Workforce Development
Council 1,614,073 980,949 633,124b
(12.2 FTE)
Workforce Improvement
Grants 1,000,000 1,000,000(I)
Hospitality Education Grant
Program 424,037 424,037
(0.5 FTE)
Employment Support and
Job Retention Services
Program Cash Fund 250,000 250,000
Employment Support and
Job Retention Services
Program 250,000 250,000c
49,109,621
a This amount shall be from the Employment Support Fund created in Section 8-77-109 (1)(b), C.R.S.
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1159

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
b This amount shall be from a portion of the federal administrative money available to mandatory and additional one-stop partners, pursuant to Section 24-46.3-101 (8), C.R.S., and
includes amounts transferred from the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act line item in this department to the Community Services Block Grant line item in the Department of
Local Affairs, the Workforce Development Council line item from the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block Grant in the Department of Human Services, and the Appropriated
Sponsored Programs line item in the Department of Education.
c This amount shall be from the Employment Support and Job Retention Services Program Cash Fund created in Section 8-83-406 (1)(a), C.R.S.
(B) Workforce Development Enterprise
Workforce Development
Enterprise 14,321,619 14,321,619a
(57.4 FTE)
14,321,619
a This amount shall be from the Workforce Development Fund created in Section 8-83-107 (4), C.R.S.
63,431,240
(4) DIVISION OF LABOR STANDARDS AND STATISTICS
(A) Labor Standards
Program Costs 9,004,121 4,886,170 4,117,951a
(85.2 FTE)
9,004,121
a Of this amount, $3,479,643 shall be from the Employment Support Fund created in Section 8-77-109 (1)(b), C.R.S., and $638,308 shall be from the Wage Theft Enforcement Fund
created in Section 8-4-113 (3)(a), C.R.S.
(B) Labor Market Information
Program Costs 3,892,916 3,892,916(I)
(30.3 FTE)
3,892,916
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1159

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
12,897,037
(5) DIVISION OF OIL AND PUBLIC SAFETY
Personal Services 6,846,690 38,886 6,224,086a 19,318b 564,400(I)
(70.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 911,122 19,789 746,312a 145,021(I)
Underground Damage
Prevention Safety
Commission 158,400 138,400 20,000a
(1.5 FTE)
7,916,212
a Of these amounts, $4,047,745 shall be from the Petroleum Storage Tank Fund created in Section 8-20.5-103 (1), C.R.S., $1,310,686 shall be from the Boiler Inspection Fund created
in Section 9-4-109 (4), C.R.S., $927,244 shall be from the Conveyance Safety Fund created in Section 9-5.5-111 (2)(b), C.R.S., $139,939 shall be from the Public Safety Inspection Fund
created in Section 8-1-151, C.R.S., $20,000 shall be from the Damage Prevention Fund created in Section 9-1.5-104.7 (1), C.R.S., and $544,784 shall be from various sources of cash
funds.
b This amount shall be from the Mobile Sources Local Grants line item and the Stationary Sources Local Contracts line item in the Department of Public Health and Environment.
(6) DIVISION OF WORKERS' COMPENSATION
(A) Workers' Compensation
Personal Services 10,342,021 10,342,021a
(104.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 671,295 671,295a
Administrative Law Judge
Services 6,423,546 6,423,546a
Physicians Accreditation 120,000 120,000(I)b
Utilization Review 35,000 35,000(I)c
Immediate Payment 1,000 1,000(I)d
17,592,862
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1159

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of these amounts, $16,827,207 shall be from the Workers' Compensation Cash Fund created in Section 8-44-112 (7)(a), C.R.S., and $609,655 shall be from various sources of cash
funds.
b This amount shall be from the Physicians Accreditation Program Cash Fund created in Section 8-42-101 (3.6)(l), C.R.S. Money in the Physicians Accreditation Program Cash Fund
is continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 8-42-101 (3.6)(l), C.R.S., and is included for informational purposes only.
c This amount shall be from the Utilization Review Cash Fund created in Section 8-43-501 (2)(a), C.R.S. Money in the Utilization Review Cash Fund is continuously appropriated,
pursuant to Section 8-43-501 (2)(a), C.R.S., and is included for informational purposes only.
d This amount shall be from the Immediate Payment Fund created in Section 8-44-206 (3)(b)(I), C.R.S. Money in the Immediate Payment Fund is continuously appropriated pursuant
to Section 8-44-206 (3)(b)(I), C.R.S., and is included for informational purposes only.
(B) Major Medical Insurance and Subsequent Injury Funds
Personal Services 1,692,383 1,692,383a
(16.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 88,324 88,324a
Major Medical Benefits 6,000,000 6,000,000(I)b
Subsequent Injury Benefits 2,000,000 2,000,000(I)c
Medical Disaster 1,000 1,000(I)d
9,781,707
a Of these amounts, an estimated $1,445,722 shall be from the Major Medical Insurance Fund created in Section 8-46-202 (1)(a), C.R.S., and an estimated $334,985 shall be from the
Subsequent Injury Fund created in Section 8-46-101 (1)(b)(I), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Major Medical Insurance Fund created in Section 8-46-202 (1)(a), C.R.S. Money in the Major Medical Insurance Fund is continuously appropriated for
payment of benefits pursuant to Section 8-46-202 (1)(c), C.R.S., and is included for informational purposes only.
c This amount shall be from the Subsequent Injury Fund created in Section 8-46-101 (1)(b)(I), C.R.S. Money in the Subsequent Injury Fund is continuously appropriated for payment
of benefits pursuant to Section 8-46-101 (4)(b), C.R.S., and is included for informational purposes only.
d This amount shall be from the Medical Disaster Insurance Fund created in Section 8-46-302 (1), C.R.S. Money in the Medical Disaster Insurance Fund is continuously appropriated
for payment of benefits pursuant to Section 8-46-303 (2), C.R.S., and is included for informational purposes only.
27,374,569
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1159

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(7) DIVISION OF VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION AND INDEPENDENT LIVING SERVICES
(A) Vocational Rehabilitation Programs65
Personal Services66 21,976,359 4,198,897 17,777,462(I)a
(229.7 FTE)
Operating Expenses 2,539,404 540,893(I)b 1,998,511(I)a
Administrative Law Judge
Services66 63,580 17,260 46,320(I)a
Vocational Rehabilitation
Services66, 67 17,007,172 1,143,950 3,821,251(I)b 12,041,971(I)a
Disability Navigator
Program66 1,847,954 392,499b 1,455,455(I)a
(0.6 FTE)
School to Work Alliance
Program 25,419,022 17,269,139(I)b 8,149,883(I)c
Vocational Rehabilitation
Mental Health Services 1,748,180 372,363(I)b 1,375,817(I)c
Business Enterprise Program
for People Who Are Blind 1,688,817 338,935d 1,349,882(I)c
(6.0 FTE)
Business Enterprise Program
- Program Operated Stands,
Repair Costs, and Operator
Benefits 500,000 500,000d
Federal Social Security
Reimbursements 1,631,992 1,631,992(I)e
Older Blind Grants 462,000 462,000(I)
74,884,480
a These amounts shall be from Section 110 and Section 603 vocational rehabilitation funds, and are shown for informational purposes only.
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1159

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
b Of these amounts, an estimated $21,631,283 shall be transferred from the State Share of Districts Total Program Funding line item of the School District Operations Division in the
Department of Education on behalf of school districts pursuant to Section 22-54-115 (1.5), C.R.S., $392,499 shall be from reappropriated funds for the workforce centers in the Division
of Employment and Training, and an estimated $372,363 shall be from the Mental Health Community Programs line item within the Community-based Mental Health Services section
of the Department of Human Services.
c These amounts shall be from Section 110 vocational rehabilitation funds, and are shown for informational purposes only.
d These amounts shall be from the Business Enterprise Program Cash Fund created in Section 8-84-208, C.R.S.
e This amount reflects estimated payments from the federal Social Security Administration based on costs incurred for individuals who have received vocational rehabilitation services,
and are shown for informational purposes only.
(B) Office of Independent Living Services
Program Costs 313,516 313,516
(4.0 FTE)
Independent Living
Services67 7,780,684 6,736,324 37,635a 1,006,725(I)b
8,094,200
a This amount shall be from local recipients of Independent Living Grants. The (I) and (L) notation apply to this amount.
b This amount reflects federal funds anticipated to be received for state independent living grants, and are shown for informational purposes only.
82,978,680
(8) DIVISION OF FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE INSURANCE
Program Costs 41,666,648 41,666,648(I)a
(352.0 FTE)
41,666,648
a This amount shall be from the Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund created in Section 8-13.3-518 (1), C.R.S. Money in the Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund is
continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 8-13.3-518 (1), C.R.S., and is included for informational purposes only.
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1159

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
TOTALS PART X
(LABOR AND
EMPLOYMENT) $464,570,837 $34,543,480 $189,063,930a $23,912,040b $217,051,387c
$464,326,428 $34,206,351 $189,157,196a $23,909,288b $217,053,593c
a Of this amount, $62,227,654 $62,338,700 contains an (I) notation and $37,635 also contains an (L) notation.
b Of this amount, $22,003,646 contains an (I) notation.
c This amount contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
64 Department of Labor and Employment, Executive Director's Office, Office of Just Transition, Coal Transition Community Assistance; Coal Transition Worker
Assistance -- This appropriation remains available until the close of the 2026-27 state fiscal year.
64a DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S OFFICE, COLORADO DISABILITY OPPORTUNITY OFFICE, COLORADO DISABILITY
OPPORTUNITY OFFICE -- $2,250,000 OF THIS APPROPRIATION REMAINS AVAILABLE UNTIL THE CLOSE OF THE 2026-27 STATE FISCAL YEAR FOR GRANT
EXPENDITURES.
65 Department of Labor and Employment, Division of Vocational Rehabilitation and Independent Living Services, Vocational Rehabilitation Programs -- In
addition to the transfer authority provided in Section 24-75-108, C.R.S., the Department may transfer up to 15.0 percent of the total appropriation among the
following line items in this section: Personal Services, Operating Expenses, Vocational Rehabilitation Services, School to Work Alliance Program, and
Vocational Rehabilitation Mental Health Services.
66 Department of Labor and Employment, Division of Vocational Rehabilitation and Independent Living Services, Vocational Rehabilitation Programs, Personal
Services; Administrative Law Judge Services; Vocational Rehabilitation Services; Disability Navigator Program -- Amounts in this line item are calculated
based on the assumed federal match rate of 78.7 percent federal funds to 21.3 percent nonfederal funds and are assumed to be demonstrated on a federal fiscal
year basis.
67 Department of Labor and Employment, Division of Vocational Rehabilitation and Independent Living Services, Vocational Rehabilitation Programs,
Vocational Rehabilitation Services; Office of Independent Living Services, Independent Living Services -- In addition to the transfer authority provided in
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1159

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Section 24-75-108, C.R.S., if authorized by an independent living center based on a cooperative agreement between the independent living center and the
Division of Vocational Rehabilitation, the Department may transfer General Fund from the Independent Living Services line item to the Vocational
Rehabilitation Services line item, in an amount agreed upon between the two entities, for the purpose of drawing down federal funds for the provision of
vocational rehabilitation services.
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1159

SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1159